New York, session 2025-2026, A617.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (w) of section 1-c of the legislative law, as 2 added by section 8 of part A of chapter 399 of the laws of 2011, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (w) The term "reportable business relationship" shall mean a relation- 5 ship in which compensation is paid by a lobbyist or by a client of a 6 lobbyist, in exchange for any goods, services or anything of value, the 7 total value of which is in excess of one thousand dollars annually, to 8 be performed or provided by or intended to be performed or provided by 9 (i) any statewide elected official, state officer, state employee, 10 member of the legislature or legislative employee, or (ii) any entity in 11 which the lobbyist or the client of a lobbyist knows or has reason to 12 know the statewide elected official, state officer, state employee, 13 member of the legislature or legislative employee is a proprietor, part- 14 ner, director, officer or manager, or owns or controls ten percent or 15 more of the stock of such entity (or one percent in the case of a corpo- 16 ration whose stock is regularly traded on an established securities 17 exchange). Provided, however, that such term shall not include a 18 relationship between an individual and a college or university, as such 19 terms are defined in section two of the education law, when such indi- 20 vidual is employed by such college or university as a teaching profes- 21 sor, adjunct professor, lecturer, instructor, assistant professor, asso- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00242-05-5 A. 617--A 2 1 ciate professor, or similar teaching role, when such individual's only 2 state employment is through the state university of New York or the city 3 university of New York as a teaching professor, adjunct professor, 4 lecturer, instructor, assistant professor, associate professor, or simi- 5 lar teaching role that does not include the supervision of other state 6 employees or the management of grant-funded projects or research. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.